Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-273
Rights of judgment creditor of a partner.

On application to a court of competent jurisdiction by any judgment creditor of a partner, the court may charge the partnership interest of the partner with payment of the unsatisfied amount of the judgment with interest. To the extent so charged, the judgment creditor has only the rights of an assignee of the partnership interest. The Nebraska Uniform Limited Partnership Act does not deprive any partner of the benefit of any exemption laws applicable to his or her partnership interest.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 41;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 46.